Washington statutes.
RCW 42.14.060

Appointed officers of the state.

The governor shall, subject to such rules and regulations as he or she may adopt, permit each appointed officer of the state to designate temporary interim successors to the office of such officer.

[ 2012 c 117 s 108; 1963 c 203 s 7.]